Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part IV Exemptions from Registration

7-11-401.
Exempt securities.

The following securities are exempt from §§

7-11-301

and

7-11-404

:

A security, including a revenue obligation, issued, insured, or guaranteed by the United States, an agency or corporate or other instrumentality of the United States, an international agency or corporate or other instrumentality of which the United States and one or more foreign governments are members, a state, a political subdivision of a state, or an agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more states or their political subdivisions; or a certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing, but this exemption does not include a security payable solely from revenues to be received from a nongovernmental industrial or commercial enterprise unless the payments are insured or guaranteed by a person described as the issuer, insurer or guarantor of securities under subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), (7), or (8) of this section, or unless the revenues from which the payments are to be made are a direct obligation of a person;

A security issued, insured, or guaranteed by Canada, a Canadian province or territory, a political subdivision of Canada or a Canadian province or territory, an agency or corporation or other instrumentality of one or more of the foregoing, or any other foreign government or governmental combination or entity with which the United States maintains diplomatic relations, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer, insurer, or guarantor;

A security issued by and representing an interest in or a direct obligation of, or guaranteed by, a depository institution if the deposit or share accounts of the depository institution are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, the national credit union share insurance fund, or a successor to the applicable agency authorized by federal law;

A security issued by and representing an interest in or a direct obligation of, or insured or guaranteed by, an insurance company organized under the laws of any state and authorized to do business in this state;

A security issued or guaranteed by a railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or holding company that is:

Subject to the jurisdiction of the Interstate Commerce Commission;

A registered holding company under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, 15 U.S.C. § 79 et seq. [repealed], or a subsidiary of a registered holding company within the meaning of that act;

Regulated as to its rates and charges by a governmental authority of the United States or a state; or

Regulated as to the issuance or guarantee of the security by a governmental authority of the United States, a state, Canada, or a Canadian province or territory;

Equipment trust certificates as to equipment leased or conditionally sold to a person, if securities issued by the person would be exempt under this section;

A security listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on a national securities exchange registered under § 6 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78f; any other security of the same issuer which is of senior or substantially equal rank; a security called for by subscription right or warrant so listed or approved; or a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to any of the securities in this subsection;

A security designated or approved for designation upon notice of issuance as a national market system security by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.; any other security of the same issuer which is of senior or substantially equal rank; a security called for by subscription right or warrant so designated; or a warrant or a right to purchase or subscribe to any of the securities in this subsection;

An option issued by a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., other than an off exchange futures contract or substantially similar arrangement, if the security, currency, commodity, or other interest underlying the option:

Is registered under §

7-11-302

,

7-11-303

, or

7-11-304

;

Is exempt under this section; or

Is not otherwise required to be registered under this chapter;

A security issued by a person organized and operated not for private profit but exclusively for a religious, educational, benevolent, charitable, fraternal, social, athletic, or reformatory purpose, or as a chamber of commerce or trade or professional association;

A promissory note, draft, bill of exchange, or bankers’ acceptance that evidences an obligation to pay cash within nine (9) months after the date of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, is issued in denominations of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and receives a rating in one of the three (3) highest rating categories from a nationally recognized statistical rating organization; or a renewal of an obligation that is likewise limited, or a guarantee of an obligation or of a renewal;

A security issued in connection with an employee’s stock purchase, savings, option, profit sharing, pension, or similar employees’ benefit plan;

A membership or equity interest in, or a retention certificate or like security given in lieu of a cash patronage dividend issued by, a cooperative organized and operated as a nonprofit membership cooperative under the cooperative laws of any state if not traded to the public;

A security issued by an issuer registered as an open end management investment company or unit investment trust pursuant to § 8 of the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-8, if:

The issuer is advised by an investment adviser that is a depository institution exempt from registration under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq., or that is currently registered as an investment adviser and has been registered, or is affiliated with an adviser that has been registered as an investment adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq., for at least three (3) years immediately before an offer or sale of a security claimed to be exempt under this subsection (14)(i) and has acted, or is affiliated with an investment adviser that has acted, as investment adviser to one or more registered investment companies or unit investment trusts for at least three (3) years immediately before an offer or sale of a security claimed to be exempt under this subsection (14)(i); or

The issuer has a sponsor that has at all times throughout the three (3) years before an offer or sale of a security claimed to be exempt under this subsection (14)(ii) sponsored one or more registered investment companies or unit investment trusts the aggregate total assets of which have exceeded one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

The director has received prior to any sale exempted in this section:

A notice of intention to sell which has been executed by the issuer which states the name and address of the issuer and the title of the securities to be offered in this state; and

A filing fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In the event any offer or sale of an open end management investment company is to be made more than twelve (12) months after the date notice under subsection (14)(iii) is received by the director, another notice and payment of the applicable fee is required.

For the purpose of subsection (14) an investment adviser is affiliated with another investment adviser if it controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the other investment adviser.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 24, § 1.

7-11-402.
Exempt transactions.

The following transactions are exempt from §§

7-11-301

and

7-11-404

:

An isolated nonissuer transaction, whether or not effected through a broker-dealer;

A nonissuer transaction in an outstanding security if the issuer of the security has a class of securities subject to registration under § 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78l, and has been subject to the reporting requirements of § 13 or § 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. §§ 78m and 78o(d), for not less than ninety (90) days before the transaction; or has filed and maintained with the director for not less than ninety (90) days before the transaction information, in any form that the director, by rule, specifies, substantially comparable to the information which the issuer would be required to file under § 12(b) or § 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. §§ 78l(b) or 78l(g), were the issuer to have a class of its securities registered under § 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and paid a fee with the filing of three hundred dollars ($300);

A nonissuer transaction in a security:

Of a class outstanding in the hands of the public for not less than ninety (90) days before the transaction if a nationally recognized securities manual designated by the director, by rule or order, contains the names of the issuer’s officers and directors, a statement of financial condition of the issuer as of a date within the last eighteen (18) months, and a statement of income or operations for either the last fiscal year before that date or the most recent year of operation; or

If the security has a fixed maturity or a fixed interest or dividend provision and there has been no default during the current fiscal year or within the three (3) preceding years, or during the existence of the issuer and any predecessors if less than three (3) years, in the payment of principal, interest, or dividends on the security;

A nonissuer transaction effected by or through a registered broker-dealer pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to purchase; but the director may by rule require that the customer acknowledge upon a specified form that the sale was unsolicited, and that a signed copy of each form be preserved by the broker-dealer for a specified period;

A transaction between the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering of a security is made and an underwriter, or a transaction among underwriters;

A transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a real estate mortgage, deed of trust, personal property security agreement, or by an agreement for the sale of real estate or personal property, if the entire mortgage, deed of trust, or agreement, together with all the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness secured by them, is offered and sold as a unit;

A transaction by an executor, administrator, sheriff, marshal, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator;

A transaction executed by a bona fide secured party without a purpose of evading this chapter;

An offer to sell or sale of a security to a financial or institutional investor or to a broker-dealer;

A transaction pursuant to an offer directed by the offeror to no more than twenty-five (25) purchasers in this state, other than those designated in subsection (9), during any twelve (12) consecutive months; no general solicitation or general advertising is used in connection with the offer to sell or sale of the securities; and no commission or other similar compensation is paid or given, directly or indirectly, to a person, other than a broker-dealer licensed or not required to be licensed under this chapter, for soliciting a prospective purchaser in this state; and either:

The seller reasonably believes that all the purchasers in this state, other than those designated in subsection (9) are purchasing for investment; or

Immediately before and immediately after the transaction, the issuer reasonably believes that the securities of the issuer are held by fifty (50) or fewer beneficial owners, other than those designated in subsection (9) and the transaction is part of an aggregate offering that does not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) during any twelve (12) consecutive months;

An offer to sell or sale of a preorganization certificate or subscription if no commission or other similar compensation is paid or given, directly or indirectly, for soliciting a prospective subscriber; no public advertising or general solicitation is used in connection with the offer to sell or sale; the number of subscribers does not exceed ten (10); and no payment is made by a subscriber;

An offer to sell or sale of a preorganization certificate or subscription agreement issued in connection with the organization of a depository institution if that organization is under the supervision of an official or agency of any state or of the United States that has and exercises the authority to regulate and supervise the organization of the depository institution. For the purposes of this subsection, supervision of the organization by an official or agency means that the official or agency by law has authority to require disclosures to prospective investors similar to that required under §

7-11-304

, impound proceeds from the sale of preorganization certificates or subscription agreements until organization of the depository institution is completed, and require refund to investors if the depository institution does not obtain a grant of authority from the appropriate official or agency;

A transaction pursuant to an offer to sell to existing security holders of the issuer, including persons who at the time of the transaction are holders of transferable warrants exercisable within not more than ninety (90) days after their issuance, convertible securities, or nontransferable warrants, if:

No commission or other similar compensation, other than a standby commission, is directly or indirectly paid or given, for soliciting a security holder in this state; or

The issuer first files a notice specifying the terms of the offer to sell and the director does not by order disallow the exemption within the next five (5) full business days;

A transaction involving an offer to sell, but not a sale, of a security not exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., if:

A registration or offering statement or similar document as required under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., has been filed, but is not effective;

A registration statement, if required, has been filed under this chapter, but is not effective; and

No stop order of which the offeror is aware has been entered by the director or the Securities and Exchange Commission, and no examination or public proceeding that may culminate in that kind of order is known by the offeror to be pending;

A transaction involving an offer to sell, but not a sale, of a security exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., if:

A registration statement has been filed under this chapter, but is not effective; and

No stop order of which the offeror is aware has been entered by the director and no examination or public proceeding that may culminate in that kind of order is known by the offeror to be pending;

A transaction involving the distribution of the securities of an issuer to the security holders of another person in connection with a merger, consolidation, exchange of securities, sale of assets, or other reorganization to which the issuer, or its parent or subsidiary, and the other person, or its parent or subsidiary, are parties, if:

The securities to be distributed are registered under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., before the consummation of the transaction; or

The securities to be distributed are not required to be registered under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., written notice of the transaction and a copy of the materials, if any, by which approval of the transaction will be solicited is given to the director at least ten (10) days before the consummation of the transaction and the director does not disallow by order the exemption within the next ten (10) days;

A transaction involving the offer to sell or sale of one or more promissory notes each of which is directly secured by a first lien on a single parcel of real estate, or a transaction involving the offer to sell or sale of participation interests in the notes if the notes and participation interests are originated by a depository institution and are offered and sold subject to the following conditions:

The minimum aggregate sales price paid by each purchaser may not be less than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);

Each purchaser must pay cash either at the time of the sale or within sixty (60) days after the sale; and

Each purchaser may buy for that person’s own account only;

A transaction involving the offer to sell or sale of one or more promissory notes directly secured by a first lien on a single parcel of real estate or participation interests in the notes, if the notes and participation interests are originated by a mortgagee approved by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development under §§ 203 and 211 of the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. §§ 1709 and 1715b, and are offered or sold, subject to the conditions specified in subsection (17)(i), to a depository institution or insurance company, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or the Government National Mortgage Association; and

A transaction between any of the persons described in subsection (17)(ii) involving a nonassignable contract to buy or sell the securities described in subsection (17)(i) which contract is to be completed within two (2) years if:

The seller of the securities pursuant to the contract is one of the parties described in subsection (17)(i) or (17)(ii) who may originate securities;

The purchaser of securities pursuant to a contract is any other person described in subsection (17)(ii); and

The conditions described in subsection (17)(i) are fulfilled; and

Any offer or sale of securities made in reliance on the exemptions provided by Rule 505 or 506 of regulation D as may be amended from time to time, under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., and the provisions of the rules under that Act as amended from time to time; provided:

No commission or other remuneration may be paid or given directly or indirectly, to any person for soliciting or selling to any person in this state in reliance on this exemption, except to persons registered under §§

7-11-201

—

7-11-204

;

Not later than ten (10) days, or a shorter period that may be permitted by order of the director, prior to the first sale of securities in reliance on this exemption, there is filed with the director:

A Uniform Consent to Service of Process (Form U2);

A notice of original filing on Form D; and

A fee of three hundred dollars ($300).

No exemption is available for the securities of any issuer if any of the parties described in Securities and Exchange Commission regulation A. Rule 230.252, Section (c), (d), (e) or (f) under the Securities Act of 1933 are disqualified pursuant to a rule adopted by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 11.

7-11-403.
Provisions applicable to exemptions generally.

The director may by order deny or revoke an exemption specified in §

7-11-401

or

7-11-402

regarding a specific security or transaction if the director reasonably believes, after inquiry, that there is about to be or has been a violation of this chapter and that the action is necessary or appropriate for the protection of investors. Following entry of any order, the procedures set forth in §

7-11-710

shall be followed. No order under this subsection may operate retroactively.

In any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

The director may by rule exempt any other class of securities or transactions from §§

7-11-301

and

7-11-404

. Exemptions are subject to restrictions and conditions imposed by rule that the director determines are necessary for the protection of investors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-404.
Filing of sales and advertising literature.

The director may require by rule or order the filing of a prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature or advertising communication addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, including clients or prospective clients of an investment adviser or federal covered adviser, unless the security or transaction is exempt under §

7-11-401

or

7-11-402

or is a federal covered security.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.